Hawaii statutes.
[§245-57] Documentation of foreign
cigarettes. On the first business day of each month, each licensee shall
file the following documents with the department and the attorney general for
all cigarettes imported into the United States to which the licensee or
licensee's agent has affixed a cigarette tax stamp in the preceding month:

(1) A copy of a permit issued pursuant to the
Internal Revenue Code, Title 26 U.S.C. section 5713, to the person importing
the cigarettes into the United States, permitting the person to import the
cigarettes;

(2) A copy of the United States Customs Service form
containing, with respect to the cigarettes, the internal revenue tax
information required by the United States Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco and
Firearms;

(3) A statement, signed by the licensee under penalty
of perjury, that shall be treated as confidential by the department and shall
be exempt from disclosure under chapter 92F, identifying:

(A) The brand and brand styles of all
cigarettes;

(B) The quantity of each brand style of the
cigarettes;

(C) The supplier of the cigarettes; and

(D) The person or persons, if any, to whom
the cigarettes have been conveyed for resale; and

(4) A statement, signed under penalty of perjury by
an officer of the manufacturer or importer of the cigarettes, certifying that
the manufacturer or importer has complied with:

(A) The package health warning and ingredient
reporting requirements of the federal Cigarette Labeling and Advertising Act,
Title 15 U.S.C. sections 1333 and 1335a, with respect to the cigarettes; and

(B) Chapter 675, including a statement of
whether the manufacturer is or is not a participating manufacturer within the
meaning of section 675-3. [L 2000, c 201, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next